District of Columbia statutes.
7-871.06

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The Mayor is authorized to adopt, in whole or in part, guidelines issued by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and may consider such other materials relating to lead poisoning prevention, testing, and treatment, as deemed appropriate.

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 2006, 49 DCR 6968

History

This section is referenced in § 7-871.03.

Section References

2001 Ed., § 7-1036.

Prior Codifications